lt-LT: Lankininkystės taikinio tipas: 3D taikinys; Šaudymo maišas; Šaudymo stendas; Arbaleto taikinys; Putplasčio taikinys; Popierinis taikinys; Apvalus taikinys; Kita
en: Archery target type: 3D target; Bag target; Block target; Crossbow target; Foam target; Paper target; Target face; Other
es: Tipo de objetivo de tiro con arco: Objetivo 3D; Objetivo de bolsa; Objetivo de bloque; Blanco para ballestas; Objetivo de espuma; Objetivo de papel; Cara del objetivo; Otros
zh-CN: 箭靶类型: 3D 靶; 袋靶; 块靶; 弩靶; 泡沫靶; 纸靶; 靶面; 其他
ko: 양궁 표적 유형: 3D 표적; 가방 표적; 블록 표적; 활/석궁 표적; 폼 표적; 종이 표적; 표적 페이스; 기타
el: Τύπος στόχου τοξοβολίας: Τρισδιάστατος στόχος; Στόχος τσάντα; Τετράγωνος στόχος; Στόχος για βαλλίστρες; Στόχος αφρού; Χάρτινος στόχος; Πρόσωπο στόχου; Άλλο
zh-TW: 箭靶類型: 3D 目標; 袋狀標靶; 塊狀標靶; 弓弩標靶; 泡棉標靶; 紙製標靶; 靶面; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de țintă pentru tir cu arcul: Țintă 3D; Țintă tip sac; Țintă tip bloc; Țintă pentru arbaletă; Țintă din spumă; Țintă de hârtie; Țintă cu față; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de alvos para tiro com arco: Alvo 3D; Saco de tiro; Bastidor; Alvo de tiro com arco; Alvo de espuma; Alvo de papel; Alvo com rosto; Outro
nb: Type bueskyttermål: 3D-mål; Sekkemål; Blokkmål; Armbrøstmål; Skummål; Papirmål; Målansikt; Annet
ru: Тип мишени для стрельбы из лука: 3D-мишень; Мишень-щит; Мишень-куб; Мишень для арбалета; Пенопластовая мишень; Бумажная мишень; Поверхность мишени; Другое
da: Type af bueskydningsskive: 3D-mål; Taskemål; Blokmål; Mål til armbrøst; Skummål; Papirmål; Målskive; Andet
fr: Type de cible de tir à l’arc: Cible 3D; Cible sac; Cible bloc; Cible arbalète; Cible en mousse; Cible en papier; Visage cible; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta mete za streličarstvo: 3D meta; Vrećasta meta; Blok-meta; Meta za samostrel; Pjenasta meta; Papirnata meta; Izgled mete; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de alvo para tiro com arco: Alvo 3D; Alvo de saco; Alvo de bloco; Alvo para besta; Alvo de espuma; Alvo de papel; Face do alvo; Outro
vi: Loại bia bắn cung: Bia 3D; Bia túi; Bia khối; Bia nỏ; Bia bọt; Bia giấy; Mặt bia; Khác
de: Typen von Zielscheiben für Bogenschießen: 3D-Ziel; Zieltasche; Block Zielscheibe; Armbrustziel; Schaumstoff-Zielscheibe; Papierzielscheibe; Zielfläche; Sonstiges
ja: アーチェリーターゲットのタイプ: 3Dターゲット; バッグターゲット; ブロックターゲット; クロスボウターゲット; フォームターゲット; ペーパーターゲット; ターゲットフェイス; その他
sv: Typ av måltavla för bågskytte: 3D-måltavla; Skjutsäck; Blockmåltavla; Pilbågs- och armborstmål; Skummåltavla; Pappersmåltavla; Måltavlans framsida; Övrigt
nl: Type doelwitten voor boogschieten: 3D-doelwit; Zakdoelwit; Blokdoelwit; Kruisboogdoelwit; Schuimdoelwit; Papierdoelwit; Doelwit; Andere
sk-SK: Typ terča pre lukostreľbu: 3D terč; Taška na terč; Blokový terč; Terč na streľbu z kuše; Penový terč; Papierový terč; Tvarový terč; Iné
cs: Typ lukostřeleckého terče: 3D terč; Terčovnice; Blokový terč; Terč pro kuše; Pěnový terč; Papírový terč; Plocha terče; Jiné
tr: Ok hedef türleri: 3D hedef; Torba hedef; Blok hedef; Arbalet hedefi; Köpük hedef; Kağıt hedef; Hedef yüzü; Diğer
it: Tipo di bersaglio per tiro con l’arco: Bersaglio 3D; Bersaglio a sacco; Blocco bersaglio; Bersagli per balestra; Bersaglio in schiuma; Bersaglio di carta; Faccia bersaglio; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta lokostrelske tarče: 3D tarča; Tarče vreče; Tarče kocke; Tarča za samostrel; Penasta tarča; Papirnata tarča; Tarča z obrazom; Druga
hu: Íjászati céltábla típusa: 3D-s célpont; Zsák célpont; Tömb célpont; Számszeríj célpont; EVA célpont; Papír célpont; Céltábla; Egyéb
fi: Jousiammuntamaalitaulun tyyppi: 3D-maali; Pussimaalitaulu; Kuutiomaalitaulu; Varsijousimaalitaulu; Vaahtomuovimaalitaulu; Paperimaalitaulu; Maalitaulun osumapinta; Muu
pl: Typ tarczy łuczniczej: Cel 3D; Tarcza workowa; Tarcza blokowa; Tarcza do kuszy; Tarcza piankowa; Tarcza papierowa; Powierzchnia tarczy; Inne
th: ประเภทของเป้ายิงธนู: เป้า 3 มิติ; เป้าแบบกระเป๋า; เป้าแบบบล็อก; เป้าหน้าไม้; เป้าโฟม; เป้ากระดาษ; ใบแปะหน้าเป้า; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип мишена за стрелба с лък: 3D мишена; Торба мишена; Блокова мишена; Мишена за арбалет; Мишена от пяна; Хартиена мишена; Лице мишена; Други